Nebraska, session 109, LB1184.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1184 LB1184
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 6 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Nebraska Tribal College Investment Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Nebraska Tribal College Investment Act,
Nebraska tribal college means a 1994 Institution as defined in section
532 of the Equity in Educational Land-Grant Status Act of 1994, Public
Law 103-382, 7 U.S.C. 301 note, that is located in Nebraska.
Sec. 3. The purpose of the Nebraska Tribal College Investment Act
is to partner with private sector by providing grants to qualified
Nebraska tribal colleges to provide increased access to educational
programs with high demand.
Sec. 4. (1) Beginning July 1 and ending September 1 of any fiscal
year for which funds have been appropriated to the Nebraska Tribal
College Investment Act Fund, a Nebraska tribal college may apply to the
Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education in a manner
prescribed by the commission for a matching grant to provide increased
access to educational programs with high demand.
(2) To be eligible, an applicant shall specify the amount and
provide proof of newly committed funds from private sources available for
expenditure during the fiscal year for which the grant is being sought.
The maximum grant award for any applicant shall be equal to the amount of
such newly committed funds.
(3) The commission shall award grants based on applications received
pursuant to this section and shall disburse the grant proceeds to any
grant recipient on or before January 1 of such fiscal year.
Sec. 5. The Nebraska Tribal College Investment Act Fund is created.
The fund shall consist of transfers authorized by the Legislature and any
grants, gifts, or bequests from any source, including federal, state,
public, and private sources. The fund shall be administered by the
Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education and used to carry out
grants under the Nebraska Tribal College Investment Act. Any money in the
fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
-2-

LB1184 LB1184
2026 2026
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 6. The Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education may
adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Nebraska
Tribal College Investment Act.
-3-